tables/ko-2020-context.cti
always 네옠 14-1345-36-34-235
always 네옡 14-1345-36-34-236
always 네옢 14-1345-36-34-256
always 네옣 14-1345-36-34-356
always 녀예 14-156-36-34
always 녀옉 14-156-36-34-1
always 녀옊 14-156-36-34-1-1
always 녀옋 14-156-36-34-1-3
always 녀옌 14-156-36-34-25
always 녀옍 14-156-36-34-25-13
always 녀옎 14-156-36-34-25-356
always 녀옏 14-156-36-34-35
always 녀옐 14-156-36-34-2
always 녀옑 14-156-36-34-2-1
always 녀옒 14-156-36-34-2-26
always 녀옓 14-156-36-34-2-12
always 녀옔 14-156-36-34-2-3
always 녀옕 14-156-36-34-2-236
always 녀옖 14-156-36-34-2-256
always 녀옗 14-156-36-34-2-356
always 녀옘 14-156-36-34-26
always 녀옙 14-156-36-34-12
always 녀옚 14-156-36-34-12-3
always 녀옛 14-156-36-34-3
always 녀옜 14-156-36-34-34
always 녀옝 14-156-36-34-2356
always 녀옞 14-156-36-34-13
always 녀옟 14-156-36-34-23
always 녀옠 14-156-36-34-235
always 녀옡 14-156-36-34-236
always 녀옢 14-156-36-34-256
always 녀옣 14-156-36-34-356
always 녜예 14-34-36-34
always 녜옉 14-34-36-34-1
always 녜옊 14-34-36-34-1-1
always 녜옋 14-34-36-34-1-3
always 녜옌 14-34-36-34-25
always 녜옍 14-34-36-34-25-13
always 녜옎 14-34-36-34-25-356
always 녜옏 14-34-36-34-35
always 녜옐 14-34-36-34-2
always 녜옑 14-34-36-34-2-1
always 녜옒 14-34-36-34-2-26
always 녜옓 14-34-36-34-2-12
always 녜옔 14-34-36-34-2-3
always 녜옕 14-34-36-34-2-236
always 녜옖 14-34-36-34-2-256
always 녜옗 14-34-36-34-2-356
always 녜옘 14-34-36-34-26
always 녜옙 14-34-36-34-12
always 녜옚 14-34-36-34-12-3
always 녜옛 14-34-36-34-3
always 녜옜 14-34-36-34-34
always 녜옝 14-34-36-34-2356
always 녜옞 14-34-36-34-13
always 녜옟 14-34-36-34-23
always 녜옠 14-34-36-34-235
always 녜옡 14-34-36-34-236
always 녜옢 14-34-36-34-256
always 녜옣 14-34-36-34-356
always 노예 14-136-36-34
always 노옉 14-136-36-34-1
always 노옊 14-136-36-34-1-1
always 노옋 14-136-36-34-1-3
always 노옌 14-136-36-34-25
always 노옍 14-136-36-34-25-13
always 노옎 14-136-36-34-25-356
always 노옏 14-136-36-34-35
always 노옐 14-136-36-34-2
always 노옑 14-136-36-34-2-1
always 노옒 14-136-36-34-2-26
always 노옓 14-136-36-34-2-12
always 노옔 14-136-36-34-2-3
always 노옕 14-136-36-34-2-236
always 노옖 14-136-36-34-2-256
always 노옗 14-136-36-34-2-356
always 노옘 14-136-36-34-26
always 노옙 14-136-36-34-12
always 노옚 14-136-36-34-12-3
always 노옛 14-136-36-34-3
always 노옜 14-136-36-34-34
always 노옝 14-136-36-34-2356
always 노옞 14-136-36-34-13
always 노옟 14-136-36-34-23
always 노옠 14-136-36-34-235
always 노옡 14-136-36-34-236
always 노옢 14-136-36-34-256
always 노옣 14-136-36-34-356
always 놔애 14-1236-36-1235
always 놔액 14-1236-36-1235-1
always 놔앢 14-1236-36-1235-1-1
always 놔앣 14-1236-36-1235-1-3
always 놔앤 14-1236-36-1235-25
always 놔앥 14-1236-36-1235-25-13
always 놔앦 14-1236-36-1235-25-356
always 놔앧 14-1236-36-1235-35
always 놔앨 14-1236-36-1235-2
always 놔앩 14-1236-36-1235-2-1
always 놔앪 14-1236-36-1235-2-26
always 놔앫 14-1236-36-1235-2-12
always 놔앬 14-1236-36-1235-2-3
always 놔앭 14-1236-36-1235-2-236
always 놔앮 14-1236-36-1235-2-256
always 놔앯 14-1236-36-1235-2-356
always 놔앰 14-1236-36-1235-26
always 놔앱 14-1236-36-1235-12
always 놔앲 14-1236-36-1235-12-3
always 놔앳 14-1236-36-1235-3
always 놔앴 14-1236-36-1235-34
always 놔앵 14-1236-36-1235-2356
always 놔앶 14-1236-36-1235-13
always 놔앷 14-1236-36-1235-23
always 놔앸 14-1236-36-1235-235
always 놔앹 14-1236-36-1235-236
always 놔앺 14-1236-36-1235-256
always 놔앻 14-1236-36-1235-356
always 놔예 14-1236-36-34
always 놔옉 14-1236-36-34-1
always 놔옊 14-1236-36-34-1-1
always 놔옋 14-1236-36-34-1-3
always 놔옌 14-1236-36-34-25
always 놔옍 14-1236-36-34-25-13
always 놔옎 14-1236-36-34-25-356
always 놔옏 14-1236-36-34-35
always 놔옐 14-1236-36-34-2
always 놔옑 14-1236-36-34-2-1
always 놔옒 14-1236-36-34-2-26
always 놔옓 14-1236-36-34-2-12
always 놔옔 14-1236-36-34-2-3
always 놔옕 14-1236-36-34-2-236
always 놔옖 14-1236-36-34-2-256
always 놔옗 14-1236-36-34-2-356
always 놔옘 14-1236-36-34-26
always 놔옙 14-1236-36-34-12
always 놔옚 14-1236-36-34-12-3
always 놔옛 14-1236-36-34-3
always 놔옜 14-1236-36-34-34
always 놔옝 14-1236-36-34-2356
always 놔옞 14-1236-36-34-13
always 놔옟 14-1236-36-34-23
always 놔옠 14-1236-36-34-235
always 놔옡 14-1236-36-34-236
always 놔옢 14-1236-36-34-256
always 놔옣 14-1236-36-34-356
always 놰예 14-1236-1235-36-34
always 놰옉 14-1236-1235-36-34-1
always 놰옊 14-1236-1235-36-34-1-1
always 놰옋 14-1236-1235-36-34-1-3
always 놰옌 14-1236-1235-36-34-25
always 놰옍 14-1236-1235-36-34-25-13
always 놰옎 14-1236-1235-36-34-25-356
always 놰옏 14-1236-1235-36-34-35
always 놰옐 14-1236-1235-36-34-2
always 놰옑 14-1236-1235-36-34-2-1
always 놰옒 14-1236-1235-36-34-2-26
always 놰옓 14-1236-1235-36-34-2-12
always 놰옔 14-1236-1235-36-34-2-3
always 놰옕 14-1236-1235-36-34-2-236
always 놰옖 14-1236-1235-36-34-2-256
always 놰옗 14-1236-1235-36-34-2-356
always 놰옘 14-1236-1235-36-34-26
always 놰옙 14-1236-1235-36-34-12
always 놰옚 14-1236-1235-36-34-12-3
always 놰옛 14-1236-1235-36-34-3
always 놰옜 14-1236-1235-36-34-34
always 놰옝 14-1236-1235-36-34-2356
always 놰옞 14-1236-1235-36-34-13
always 놰옟 14-1236-1235-36-34-23
always 놰옠 14-1236-1235-36-34-235
always 놰옡 14-1236-1235-36-34-236
always 놰옢 14-1236-1235-36-34-256
always 놰옣 14-1236-1235-36-34-356
always 뇌예 14-13456-36-34
always 뇌옉 14-13456-36-34-1
always 뇌옊 14-13456-36-34-1-1
always 뇌옋 14-13456-36-34-1-3
always 뇌옌 14-13456-36-34-25
always 뇌옍 14-13456-36-34-25-13
always 뇌옎 14-13456-36-34-25-356
always 뇌옏 14-13456-36-34-35
always 뇌옐 14-13456-36-34-2
always 뇌옑 14-13456-36-34-2-1
always 뇌옒 14-13456-36-34-2-26
always 뇌옓 14-13456-36-34-2-12
always 뇌옔 14-13456-36-34-2-3
always 뇌옕 14-13456-36-34-2-236
always 뇌옖 14-13456-36-34-2-256
always 뇌옗 14-13456-36-34-2-356
always 뇌옘 14-13456-36-34-26
always 뇌옙 14-13456-36-34-12
always 뇌옚 14-13456-36-34-12-3
always 뇌옛 14-13456-36-34-3
always 뇌옜 14-13456-36-34-34
always 뇌옝 14-13456-36-34-2356
always 뇌옞 14-13456-36-34-13
always 뇌옟 14-13456-36-34-23
always 뇌옠 14-13456-36-34-235
always 뇌옡 14-13456-36-34-236
always 뇌옢 14-13456-36-34-256
always 뇌옣 14-13456-36-34-356
always 뇨예 14-346-36-34
always 뇨옉 14-346-36-34-1
always 뇨옊 14-346-36-34-1-1
always 뇨옋 14-346-36-34-1-3
always 뇨옌 14-346-36-34-25
always 뇨옍 14-346-36-34-25-13
always 뇨옎 14-346-36-34-25-356
always 뇨옏 14-346-36-34-35
always 뇨옐 14-346-36-34-2
always 뇨옑 14-346-36-34-2-1
always 뇨옒 14-346-36-34-2-26
always 뇨옓 14-346-36-34-2-12
always 뇨옔 14-346-36-34-2-3
always 뇨옕 14-346-36-34-2-236
always 뇨옖 14-346-36-34-2-256
always 뇨옗 14-346-36-34-2-356
always 뇨옘 14-346-36-34-26
always 뇨옙 14-346-36-34-12
always 뇨옚 14-346-36-34-12-3
always 뇨옛 14-346-36-34-3
always 뇨옜 14-346-36-34-34
always 뇨옝 14-346-36-34-2356
always 뇨옞 14-346-36-34-13
always 뇨옟 14-346-36-34-23
always 뇨옠 14-346-36-34-235
always 뇨옡 14-346-36-34-236
always 뇨옢 14-346-36-34-256
always 뇨옣 14-346-36-34-356
always 누애 14-134-36-1235
always 누액 14-134-36-1235-1
always 누앢 14-134-36-1235-1-1
always 누앣 14-134-36-1235-1-3
always 누앤 14-134-36-1235-25
always 누앥 14-134-36-1235-25-13
always 누앦 14-134-36-1235-25-356
always 누앧 14-134-36-1235-35
always 누앨 14-134-36-1235-2
always 누앩 14-134-36-1235-2-1
always 누앪 14-134-36-1235-2-26
always 누앫 14-134-36-1235-2-12
always 누앬 14-134-36-1235-2-3
always 누앭 14-134-36-1235-2-236
always 누앮 14-134-36-1235-2-256
always 누앯 14-134-36-1235-2-356
always 누앰 14-134-36-1235-26
always 누앱 14-134-36-1235-12
always 누앲 14-134-36-1235-12-3
always 누앳 14-134-36-1235-3
always 누앴 14-134-36-1235-34
always 누앵 14-134-36-1235-2356
always 누앶 14-134-36-1235-13
always 누앷 14-134-36-1235-23
always 누앸 14-134-36-1235-235
always 누앹 14-134-36-1235-236
always 누앺 14-134-36-1235-256
always 누앻 14-134-36-1235-356
always 누예 14-134-36-34
always 누옉 14-134-36-34-1
always 누옊 14-134-36-34-1-1
always 누옋 14-134-36-34-1-3
always 누옌 14-134-36-34-25
always 누옍 14-134-36-34-25-13
always 누옎 14-134-36-34-25-356
always 누옏 14-134-36-34-35
always 누옐 14-134-36-34-2
always 누옑 14-134-36-34-2-1
always 누옒 14-134-36-34-2-26
always 누옓 14-134-36-34-2-12
always 누옔 14-134-36-34-2-3
always 누옕 14-134-36-34-2-236
always 누옖 14-134-36-34-2-256
always 누옗 14-134-36-34-2-356
always 누옘 14-134-36-34-26
always 누옙 14-134-36-34-12
always 누옚 14-134-36-34-12-3
always 누옛 14-134-36-34-3
always 누옜 14-134-36-34-34
always 누옝 14-134-36-34-2356
always 누옞 14-134-36-34-13
always 누옟 14-134-36-34-23
always 누옠 14-134-36-34-235
always 누옡 14-134-36-34-236
always 누옢 14-134-36-34-256
always 누옣 14-134-36-34-356
always 눠애 14-1234-36-1235
always 눠액 14-1234-36-1235-1
always 눠앢 14-1234-36-1235-1-1
always 눠앣 14-1234-36-1235-1-3
always 눠앤 14-1234-36-1235-25
always 눠앥 14-1234-36-1235-25-13
always 눠앦 14-1234-36-1235-25-356
always 눠앧 14-1234-36-1235-35
always 눠앨 14-1234-36-1235-2
always 눠앩 14-1234-36-1235-2-1
always 눠앪 14-1234-36-1235-2-26
always 눠앫 14-1234-36-1235-2-12
always 눠앬 14-1234-36-1235-2-3
always 눠앭 14-1234-36-1235-2-236
always 눠앮 14-1234-36-1235-2-256
always 눠앯 14-1234-36-1235-2-356
always 눠앰 14-1234-36-1235-26
always 눠앱 14-1234-36-1235-12
always 눠앲 14-1234-36-1235-12-3
always 눠앳 14-1234-36-1235-3
always 눠앴 14-1234-36-1235-34
always 눠앵 14-1234-36-1235-2356
always 눠앶 14-1234-36-1235-13
always 눠앷 14-1234-36-1235-23
always 눠앸 14-1234-36-1235-235
always 눠앹 14-1234-36-1235-236
always 눠앺 14-1234-36-1235-256
always 눠앻 14-1234-36-1235-356
always 눠예 14-1234-36-34
always 눠옉 14-1234-36-34-1
always 눠옊 14-1234-36-34-1-1
always 눠옋 14-1234-36-34-1-3
always 눠옌 14-1234-36-34-25
always 눠옍 14-1234-36-34-25-13
always 눠옎 14-1234-36-34-25-356
always 눠옏 14-1234-36-34-35
always 눠옐 14-1234-36-34-2
always 눠옑 14-1234-36-34-2-1
always 눠옒 14-1234-36-34-2-26
always 눠옓 14-1234-36-34-2-12
always 눠옔 14-1234-36-34-2-3
always 눠옕 14-1234-36-34-2-236
always 눠옖 14-1234-36-34-2-256
always 눠옗 14-1234-36-34-2-356
always 눠옘 14-1234-36-34-26
always 눠옙 14-1234-36-34-12
always 눠옚 14-1234-36-34-12-3
always 눠옛 14-1234-36-34-3
always 눠옜 14-1234-36-34-34
always 눠옝 14-1234-36-34-2356
always 눠옞 14-1234-36-34-13
always 눠옟 14-1234-36-34-23
always 눠옠 14-1234-36-34-235
always 눠옡 14-1234-36-34-236
always 눠옢 14-1234-36-34-256
always 눠옣 14-1234-36-34-356
always 눼예 14-1234-1235-36-34
always 눼옉 14-1234-1235-36-34-1
always 눼옊 14-1234-1235-36-34-1-1
always 눼옋 14-1234-1235-36-34-1-3
always 눼옌 14-1234-1235-36-34-25
always 눼옍 14-1234-1235-36-34-25-13
always 눼옎 14-1234-1235-36-34-25-356
always 눼옏 14-1234-1235-36-34-35
always 눼옐 14-1234-1235-36-34-2
always 눼옑 14-1234-1235-36-34-2-1
always 눼옒 14-1234-1235-36-34-2-26
always 눼옓 14-1234-1235-36-34-2-12
always 눼옔 14-1234-1235-36-34-2-3
always 눼옕 14-1234-1235-36-34-2-236
always 눼옖 14-1234-1235-36-34-2-256
always 눼옗 14-1234-1235-36-34-2-356
always 눼옘 14-1234-1235-36-34-26
always 눼옙 14-1234-1235-36-34-12
always 눼옚 14-1234-1235-36-34-12-3
always 눼옛 14-1234-1235-36-34-3
always 눼옜 14-1234-1235-36-34-34
always 눼옝 14-1234-1235-36-34-2356
always 눼옞 14-1234-1235-36-34-13
always 눼옟 14-1234-1235-36-34-23
always 눼옠 14-1234-1235-36-34-235
always 눼옡 14-1234-1235-36-34-236
always 눼옢 14-1234-1235-36-34-256
always 눼옣 14-1234-1235-36-34-356
always 뉘예 14-134-1235-36-34
always 뉘옉 14-134-1235-36-34-1
always 뉘옊 14-134-1235-36-34-1-1
always 뉘옋 14-134-1235-36-34-1-3
always 뉘옌 14-134-1235-36-34-25
always 뉘옍 14-134-1235-36-34-25-13
always 뉘옎 14-134-1235-36-34-25-356
always 뉘옏 14-134-1235-36-34-35
always 뉘옐 14-134-1235-36-34-2
always 뉘옑 14-134-1235-36-34-2-1
always 뉘옒 14-134-1235-36-34-2-26
always 뉘옓 14-134-1235-36-34-2-12
always 뉘옔 14-134-1235-36-34-2-3
always 뉘옕 14-134-1235-36-34-2-236
always 뉘옖 14-134-1235-36-34-2-256
always 뉘옗 14-134-1235-36-34-2-356
always 뉘옘 14-134-1235-36-34-26
always 뉘옙 14-134-1235-36-34-12
always 뉘옚 14-134-1235-36-34-12-3
always 뉘옛 14-134-1235-36-34-3
always 뉘옜 14-134-1235-36-34-34
always 뉘옝 14-134-1235-36-34-2356
always 뉘옞 14-134-1235-36-34-13
always 뉘옟 14-134-1235-36-34-23
always 뉘옠 14-134-1235-36-34-235
always 뉘옡 14-134-1235-36-34-236
always 뉘옢 14-134-1235-36-34-256
always 뉘옣 14-134-1235-36-34-356
always 뉴예 14-146-36-34
always 뉴옉 14-146-36-34-1
always 뉴옊 14-146-36-34-1-1
always 뉴옋 14-146-36-34-1-3
always 뉴옌 14-146-36-34-25
always 뉴옍 14-146-36-34-25-13
always 뉴옎 14-146-36-34-25-356
always 뉴옏 14-146-36-34-35
always 뉴옐 14-146-36-34-2
always 뉴옑 14-146-36-34-2-1
always 뉴옒 14-146-36-34-2-26
always 뉴옓 14-146-36-34-2-12
always 뉴옔 14-146-36-34-2-3
always 뉴옕 14-146-36-34-2-236
always 뉴옖 14-146-36-34-2-256
always 뉴옗 14-146-36-34-2-356
always 뉴옘 14-146-36-34-26
always 뉴옙 14-146-36-34-12
always 뉴옚 14-146-36-34-12-3
always 뉴옛 14-146-36-34-3
